Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-101
Districts and corporations; furnish information; enforcement.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law regarding confidentiality of records, every district or corporation organized under Chapter 70 shall, upon request, furnish to any county attorney, any authorized attorney as defined in section 42-347, or the Department of Health and Human Services a utility service subscriber's name, social security number, and mailing and residence addresses only for the purposes of establishing and collecting child, spousal, and medical support and of conducting reviews under sections 43-512.12 to 43-512.18. Such information shall be used for no other purpose. An action may be filed in district court to enforce this section. For purposes of this section, utility service shall mean electrical, gas, water, telephone, garbage disposal, or waste disposal service.

Laws 1994, LB 1224, § 82;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 368;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 113.

Records, withheld from public, see section 84-712.05.